Missouri, session 2026, HB2417.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 161, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 161.1140, to read as follows:
161.1140. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Parents' Bill
of Rights Act of 2026".
2. No school district or charter school shall deny to the parent or guardian of a
minor child any or all of the following rights:
(1) The right to fully review, upon request, and make copies of, the curricula,
books, and other educational materials used by the school attended by their minor child.
This right shall be understood to:
(a) Include a right to affirmative disclosure of class syllabi and reading lists to
the parent or guardian of a minor child by the school attended by their minor child; and
(b) Prohibit a requirement that an individual sign a nondisclosure agreement as
a condition of viewing curricular materials;
(2) The right to access information, upon request, about who is teaching their
minor child including, but not limited to, guest lecturers and outside presenters. This
right shall be understood to prohibit schools from permitting or requiring the
attendance of minor children at school assemblies, field trips, and other extracurricular
activities that pertain to diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives, absent affirmative
consent from their parent or guardian;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2417 2
(3) The right to access financial information, upon request, on all third-party
individuals and organizations that receive contracts or other funding through the school
attended by their minor child, provided that no personally identifiable information
about any student shall be released;
(4) The right to visit their minor child at school during school hours subject to
rules and regulations established by the school;
(5) The right to access all student records pertaining to their minor child
generated by the school attended by their minor child or the school district that serves
such school that concerns their minor child;
(6) The right to receive information, upon request, about the collection of their
minor child's data and transmission of such data to entities outside the school district or
charter school;
(7) The right to be heard at school board meetings or other governance hearings
pertaining to the school attended by their minor child or the school district that serves
such school. This right shall be understood to require that school board meetings or
other governance hearings pertaining to curricula and school safety be conducted
publicly and allow for public comments;
(8) The right to be notified of situations affecting the safety of their minor child
at school. This right shall be understood to require, but is not limited to requiring, that
schools notify parents or guardians within forty-eight hours of any or all of the following
incidents that result in arrest:
(a) Physical assaults occurring on school premises;
(b) Sexual assaults occurring on school premises;
(c) Appearances of a deadly weapon, as such term is described in section
556.061, on school premises;
(d) Drug use or possession on school premises;
(e) Police investigations on school premises; and
(f) Felonies committed by teachers or other school or school district employees,
whether such offenses were committed on or off the campus of a school; and
(9) The right to object to the instructional materials pertaining to diversity,
equity, and inclusion used in their child's classroom based on the parent's beliefs that
such materials are inappropriate for whatever reason and to be assured that such
objectionable materials are not taught to the parent's child.
3. Any person who is denied one or more of the rights identified in subsection 2
of this section may bring a complaint with the prosecuting attorney of a county in which

HB 2417 3
the school district operates. The prosecuting attorney may bring a civil action in a court
of competent jurisdiction to obtain injunctive relief.
✔